North Dakota, session 69, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-03-11.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
20.1-03-11.4. Deer lottery license refundfee donation to private land open to sportsmen
option.
The director shall provide that each application for a deer lottery license contain the option for an
unsuccessful applicant to donate the refundlicense fee to which an unsuccessful applicant would be
entitled to the private land open to sportsmen program. All moneys collected under this section must be
placed in the game and fish private land habitat and access improvement fund and allocated to the
private land open to sportsmen program.

H. B. NO. 1412 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1412.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State